Hawaii, session 2026, GM1303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that more programs and
resources are necessary to increase family resilience and reduce
the risk of child abuse or neglect. Many families at high risk
of entering the child welfare system are unaware of available
services or how to access them, or public benefits are not
available to address the economic or other fiscal challenge they
are facing.
The malama ohana working group was established by Act 86,
Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, within the office of wellness and
resilience to seek, design, and recommend transformative changes
to the State's existing child welfare system. In its report
submitted to the 2025 legislature, the malama ohana working
group stated there is a shortage of resources in Hawaii
dedicated to preventing children and families' involvement with
child welfare services, especially primary prevention and
universal support. The malama ohana working group recommended
the establishment of primary prevention and universal support
2026-2500 SB3204 GDI SMA-l.docx
MHUWIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIliUlllffil

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
programs that are trauma-informed and culturally responsive in
an effort to divert children and families away from involvement
with the child welfare system.
The legislature also finds that community- and school-based
organizations are safe, accessible, and non-judgmental spaces
where families can access formal and informal supports and
referrals. Providing family strengthening programming helps to
increase parents' protective factors, including: parental
resilience, social connections, concrete support, knowledge of
parenting and child development, and social-emotional competence
of children. Community- and school-based organizations, such as
family resource centers, have been successful in reducing the
number of families reported to the child welfare system.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a
two-year family resilience pilot program within the office of
wellness and resilience.
SECTION 2. (a) There is established within the office of
wellness and resilience a family resilience pilot program to
build family resilience and provide comprehensive specialized
support services to eligible families. The program shall:
2026-2500 SB3204 CDl SMA-l.docx 2
iiMWiiiiigiMiiliiiniiiiii

Page 3 S.B. NO.
CD. 1
(1) Hire and train five trauma-informed peer support
resource navigators to assist up to eighty families
with enrollment in public or other benefits, parenting
classes, and cultural family strengthening program
services; provided that each peer support resource
navigator shall be trained in alignment with the
recommendations of the peer support specialists
working group established by Act 88, Session Laws of
Hawaii 2024; provided further that each peer support
resource navigator shall use motivational interviewing
methods and serve not more than twenty families;
(2) Train program staff on eligibility screening to ensure
families meet temporary assistance for needy families
(TANF) or related eligibility criteria and connect
interested and eligible families with peer support
resource navigators;
(3) Assist families to identify goals, connect them to
community resources and supports, and assist them with
applications for public assistance benefits, housing,
education, or employment that are in alignment with
their identified goals; and
2026-2500 SB3204 GDI SMA-l.docx
linilMIMHIMIIlMBMH

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(4) Identify monthly parenting classes or cultural family
strengthening services offered by contracted or
subcontracted providers and connect families to those
classes and services as appropriate.
(b) The office of wellness and resilience may contract
with a third-party administrator to operate the family
resilience pilot program.
(c) The office of wellness and resilience shall submit a
report of its findings and recommendations, including any
proposed legislation, on the family resilience pilot program to
the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening
of the regular session of 2028. The report shall include the
number of eligible families who:
(1) Connected to and are receiving community resources and
supports;
(2) Applied for public assistance benefits, housing,
education, or employment;
(3) Participated in parenting classes and cultural family
strengthening services; and
(4) Reported favorable changes in their knowledge,
attitudes or beliefs, skill acquisition, behavior, and
2026-2500 SB3204 CDl SMA-l.docx
imMiiigiiHMiii

Page 5 S.B. NO. s-
C.D. 1
relationships as a direct result of program
participation.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated or authorized from the
temporary assistance for needy families (TANK) funds the sum of
$600,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 for the family resilience pilot program established
pursuant to section 2 of this Act, including the contracting of
services to implement and operate the program.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
human services for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 4. If any part of this Act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition for the allocation of federal funds to the State, the
conflicting part of this Act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly
affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the
remainder of this Act in its application to the agencies
concerned.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026, and
shall be repealed on June 30, 2028.
2026-2500 SB3204 CDl SMA-l.docx 5
raiillllllHHIIMIHIIilll

S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 7th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 3204, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
200-26

SB No. 3204, SD 1, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives